apertium-ur-hi.ur.dix
    <pardef n="جنت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="حکومت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="کل/ا__n">
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ا</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ا</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ا</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>اؤں</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ائیں</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ما/ں__n">
      <e>       <p><l>ں</l><r>ں<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ں</l><r>ں<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤں</l><r>ں<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیں</l><r>ں<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ماما__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="غلاظت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="مکان__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ولائیت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="جو/ں__n">
      <e>       <p><l>ں</l><r>ں<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ں</l><r>ں<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤں</l><r>ں<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیں</l><r>ں<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="خصلت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="عینک"><i>عینک</i><par n="ماما__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جُوں"><i>جُو</i><par n="جو/ں__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بریک"><i>بریک</i><par n="ماما__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ماما"><i>ماما</i><par n="ماما__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پہر"><i>پہر</i><par n="ماما__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گرجا"><i>گرجا</i><par n="ماما__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کلا"><i>کل</i><par n="کل/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جنت"><i>جنت</i><par n="جنت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حکومت"><i>حکومت</i><par n="حکومت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گھٹا"><i>گھٹ</i><par n="کل/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خانساماں"><i>خانساما</i><par n="ما/ں__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مرجاں"><i>مرجا</i><par n="ما/ں__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کہکشاں"><i>کہکشا</i><par n="ما/ں__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جوں"><i>جو</i><par n="جو/ں__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خصلت"><i>خصلت</i><par n="خصلت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ولائیت"><i>ولائیت</i><par n="ولائیت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مکان"><i>مکان</i><par n="مکان__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ماں"><i>ما</i><par n="ما/ں__n"/></e>
